Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.306

Seattle Vocational Institute—Mission—Advisory committee to advise.

The mission of the institute shall be to provide occupational, basic skills, and literacy education opportunities to economically disadvantaged populations in urban areas of the college district it serves. The mission shall be achieved primarily through open-entry, open-exit, short-term, competency-based basic skill, and job training programs targeted primarily to adults. The board of trustees of the sixth college district shall appoint a nine-member advisory committee consisting of equal representation from business, labor, and community representatives to provide advice and counsel to the administration of the institute and the district administration.

[ 1991 c 238 s 100.]